District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.18

Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of the District may:

(1)

Request a tribunal of another state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

(2)

Upon request, compel a person over whom it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal of another state.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 317, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 318, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(18), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.17.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.17

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.18 has been recodified as § 46-303.19 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(19).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 318 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).